Washington statutes.
RCW 46.01.310

Immunity of director, the state, county auditors, agents, and subagents.

No civil suit or action may ever be commenced or prosecuted against the director, the state of Washington, any county auditor or other agents appointed by the director, any other government officer or entity, or against any other person, by reason of any act done or omitted to be done in connection with the titling or registration of vehicles or vessels while administering duties and responsibilities imposed on the director or as an agent of the director, or as a subagent of an agent of the director. This section does not bar the state of Washington or the director from bringing any action, whether civil or criminal, against any agent, nor shall it bar a county auditor or other agent of the director from bringing an action against the agent.

[ 2010 c 161 s 210; 1987 c 302 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Intent—Legislation to reconcile chapter 161, Laws of 2010 and other amendments made during the 2010 legislative session—2010 c 161: See notes following RCW 46.04.013.

Retroactive application—1987 c 302 s 3: "Section 3 of this act shall apply retroactively to all claims for which actions have not been filed before May 8, 1987." [ 1987 c 302 s 4.]

Severability—1987 c 302: See note following RCW 46.01.140.